Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-1452, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1-1452. On and after May 1, 2002, medical
micropigmentation may only be performed in a physician's office by:
1. A physician as defined by the Oklahoma Medical
Micropigmentation Regulation Act;
2. A person licensed to practice registered nursing by the
Oklahoma Board of Nursing who holds a current certificate issued by
the State Commissioner of Health pursuant to the provisions of the
Oklahoma Medical Micropigmentation Regulation Act while working
Req. No. 16101 Page 1

unde r supervision of a physician. Supervision may cease once a
person has been supervised for six thousand two hundred forty
(6,240) or more hours, who has reported those hours to the State
Board of Health, and who does not use prescription medication on the
client while performing the micropigmentation service. The level of
supervision shall be determined by the physician in whose office
medical micropigmentation is being performed; and
3. A person who holds a current certificate issued by the State
Commissioner of Health pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Medical Micropigmentation Regulation Act while working under
supervision of a physician. Supervision may cease once a person has
been supervised for six thousand two hundred forty (6,240) or more
hours, who has reported those hours to the State Board of Health,
and who does not use prescription medication on the client while
performing the micropigmentation service. The level of supervision
shall be determined by the physician in whose office medical
micropigmentation is being performed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16101 TJ 02/04/26




Req. No. 16101 Page 2